Tennessee, session 114, SB1935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 26-2-301(a), is amended by deleting
the last sentence and substituting:
Upon the death of an individual who is head of a family, any such exemption shall inure
to the benefit of the surviving spouse and their minor child or child who is eighteen (18)
years of age or older and has a developmental disability or intellectual disability for as
long as the spouse, minor child, or child who is eighteen (18) years of age or older and
has a developmental disability or intellectual disability uses such property as a principal
place of residence.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 26-2-301(a), is amended by
redesignating the existing subsection (a) as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (a)(2):
(2) As used in this subsection (a), "developmental disability" and "intellectual
disability" have the same meaning as defined in § 52-1-101.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 30-2-201, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The homestead in lands of a decedent, inuring to the benefit of a surviving
spouse, minor child, or a child who is eighteen (18) years of age or older and has a
developmental disability or intellectual disability, is assigned and set apart in the manner
provided in this part.
SB1935
010914
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 30-2-209, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
If real estate is so situated that homestead cannot be set apart, as provided in
this part, then the realty must be sold and thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of the
proceeds invested in real estate, under the direction of the court having jurisdiction to be
held as homestead subject to the law governing homestead, or if the court deems it
more desirable and practical, then the court may order the payment of thirty-five
thousand dollars ($35,000) in cash or other personal property outright and in fee to the
surviving spouse, if any, otherwise to a minor child or a child who is eighteen (18) years
of age or older and has a developmental disability or intellectual disability, if any, in lieu
of all other homestead rights in the realty of the deceased.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 30, Chapter 2, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
As used in this part, "developmental disability" and "intellectual disability" have
the same meaning as defined in § 52-1-101.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010914